apertium-sh-sl.sh.metadix
    <pardef n="izvje/stan__comp__sfx">
      <!-- Comparative --><!--Note: I've switched the definiteness marker here with <comp>, since definiteness is relevant only for positive, but I'm not sure if this is practical -->
      <!--Masculine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijeg</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijega</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijem</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijem</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijeg</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijega</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijeg</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijega</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijih</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijih</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sniji</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Feminine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>snija</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sniju</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snija</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijom</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijih</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Neuter-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijeg</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijega</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijem</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijem</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>im</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>snija</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijih</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snijim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>snijima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snija</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>snija</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Superlative--><!-- it's just "naj"+comparative-->
      <!--Absolute Superlative--><!-- "pre"+comparative, explained somewhere in this document-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="izvje/stan__ssup__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>stan<s n="adj"/><s n="ssup"/></r></p><par n="izvje/stan__pst__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>sno</l><r>sno<s n="adv"/><s n="ssup"/></r></p></e><!--removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="izvje/stan__sup__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>stan<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="izvje/stan__comp__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r>sno<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e><!--removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="izvje/stan__comp__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>stan<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="izvje/stan__comp__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>snije</l><r>sno<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e><!--removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="izvje/stan__pst__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>stan<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="izvje/stan__pst__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>sno</l><r>sno<s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--removable-->
    </pardef>
    <!--end 'izvje/stan'-->

    <e lm="izvjestan"><i>izvje</i><par n="izvje/stan__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="izvjestan"><i>izvje</i><par n="izvje/stan__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="izvjestan"><p><l>najizvje</l><r>izvje</r></p><par n="izvje/stan__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="izvjestan"><p><l>preizvje</l><r>izvje</r></p><par n="izvje/stan__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="žalostan"><i>žalo</i><par n="izvje/stan__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="žalostan"><i>žalo</i><par n="izvje/stan__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="žalostan"><p><l>najžalo</l><r>žalo</r></p><par n="izvje/stan__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="žalostan"><p><l>prežalo</l><r>žalo</r></p><par n="izvje/stan__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svjestan"><i>svje</i><par n="izvje/stan__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svjestan"><i>svje</i><par n="izvje/stan__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svjestan"><p><l>najsvje</l><r>svje</r></p><par n="izvje/stan__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svjestan"><p><l>presvje</l><r>svje</r></p><par n="izvje/stan__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koristan"><i>kori</i><par n="izvje/stan__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koristan"><i>kori</i><par n="izvje/stan__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koristan"><p><l>najkori</l><r>kori</r></p><par n="izvje/stan__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koristan"><p><l>prekori</l><r>kori</r></p><par n="izvje/stan__ssup__adj"/></e>
